Maryland, session 2025, SB0142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
9–105.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SPOUSE” INCLUDES A FORMER SPOUSE.
(B) [One] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, ONE
spouse is not competent to disclose any confidential communication between the spouses
occurring during their marriage.
(C) (1) A SPOUSE WHO IS THE ALLEGED VICTIM IS COMPETENT TO
DISCLOSE A CONFIDENTIAL COMMUNICATION BETWEEN SPOUSES OCCURRING
DURING THEIR MARRIAGE IN A CRIMINAL ACTION IN WHICH ONE SPOUSE IS
CHARGED WITH A CRIME AGAINST THE OTHER SPOUSE.
(2) A SPOUSE MAY NOT BE COMPELLED TO TESTIFY TO A
CONFIDENTIAL COMMUNICATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 1 –